test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-vesi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vesi: # Noun 'water'
     vesi+N+Sg+Nom: vesi
     vesi+N+Sg+Gen: veen
     vesi+N+Sg+Acc: veen
     vesi+N+Sg+Part: vettä
     vesi+N+Sg+Ill: vettee
     vesi+N+Sg+Ine: vees
     vesi+N+Sg+Ela: veest
     vesi+N+Sg+All: veelle
     vesi+N+Sg+Ade: veel
     vesi+N+Sg+Abl: veelt
     vesi+N+Sg+Tra: veeks
     vesi+N+Sg+Ess: vetteennä
     vesi+N+Sg+Exe: vettent

     vesi+N+Pl+Nom: veet
     vesi+N+Pl+Gen: vessiin
     vesi+N+Pl+Acc: veet
     vesi+N+Pl+Part: vessiä
     vesi+N+Pl+Ill: vessii
     vesi+N+Pl+Ine: vesis
     vesi+N+Pl+Ela: vesist
     vesi+N+Pl+All: vesille
     vesi+N+Pl+Ade: vesil
     vesi+N+Pl+Abl: vesilt
     vesi+N+Pl+Tra: vesiks
     vesi+N+Pl+Ess: vessiinnä
     vesi+N+Pl+Exe: vessint
